Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,142
Procedure for judicial dissolution.

(a) Venue for a proceeding by the Attorney General to dissolve a corporation lies in the district court in the county where a corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is or was last located or the district court of Lancaster County. Venue for a proceeding brought by any other party named in section 21-19,141 lies in the county where a corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is or was last located.

(b) It is not necessary to make directors or members parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.

(c) The district court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the activities of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

(d) A person other than the Attorney General who brings an involuntary dissolution proceeding for a public benefit or religious corporation shall forthwith give written notice of the proceeding to the Attorney General who may intervene.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 142.